Texas statutes.
LOCAL GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 13. WATER AND UTILITIES

SUBTITLE C. WATER PROVISIONS APPLYING TO MORE THAN ONE TYPE OF LOCAL GOVERNMENT

CHAPTER 580. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS RELATING TO MUNICIPAL AND COUNTY WATER

Sec. 580.001. WATER CONTRACTS IN BORDER MUNICIPALITIES AND COUNTIES. The governing body of a municipality or county that has a boundary that is contiguous with the border between this state and the Republic of Mexico may contract for the acquisition of water or water rights with a border municipality or state in the Republic of Mexico if the contract is approved and monitored by the Texas Natural Resource Conservation Commission and the International Boundary and Water Commission, United States and Mexico.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 769, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 26, 1991. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 11.261, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Renumbered from Local Government Code, Section 430.001 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 885 (H.B. 2278), Sec. 3.76(c)(4), eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 580.002. CONSIDERATION OF XERISCAPE ORDINANCES. The governing body of each municipality and county may consider enacting orders or ordinances, as appropriate, requiring the use of xeriscape to conserve water. If the governing body determines that the water conservation benefits of the required use of xeriscape would be significant relative to the cost of implementing that use, the governing body may adopt a xeriscape order or ordinance, as appropriate.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 642, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Renumbered from Local Government Code, Section 430.002 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 885 (H.B. 2278), Sec. 3.76(c)(4), eff. April 1, 2009.

Text of section as amended by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1430 (S.B. 3), Sec. 2.33

Sec. 580.003. EXEMPTIONS OF CERTAIN PROPERTY FROM INFRASTRUCTURE FEES. No county, municipality, or utility district may collect from a state agency or a public or private institution of higher education any fee charged for the development or maintenance of programs or facilities for the control of excess water or storm water.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1310, Sec. 83, eff. June 20, 2003.

Renumbered from Local Government Code, Section 430.003 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 885 (H.B. 2278), Sec. 3.76(c)(4), eff. April 1, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1430 (S.B. 3), Sec. 2.33, eff. September 1, 2007.

Text of section as amended by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1356 (H.B. 462), Sec. 1

Sec. 580.003. EXEMPTIONS OF STATE PROPERTY FROM INFRASTRUCTURE FEES. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), no county, municipality, or utility district may collect from a state agency or public institution of higher education any fee charged for the development or maintenance of programs of facilities for the control of excess water or storm water.

(b) A municipality with a population of 25,000 or less and through which the Bosque River runs may collect from a state agency or public institution of higher education a fee charged for the development or maintenance of programs of facilities for the control of excess water or storm water.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1310, Sec. 83, eff. June 20, 2003.

Renumbered from Local Government Code, Section 430.003 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 885 (H.B. 2278), Sec. 3.76(c)(4), eff. April 1, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1356 (H.B. 462), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 580.004. RAINWATER HARVESTING. (a) Each municipality and county is encouraged to promote rainwater harvesting at residential, commercial, and industrial facilities through incentives such as the provision at a discount of rain barrels or rebates for water storage facilities.

(b) The Texas Water Development Board shall ensure that training on rainwater harvesting is available for the members of the permitting staffs of municipalities and counties at least quarterly. Each member of the permitting staff of each county and municipality located wholly or partly in an area designated by the Texas Commission on Environmental Quality as a priority groundwater management area under Section 35.008, Water Code, whose work relates directly to permits involving rainwater harvesting and each member of the permitting staff of each county and municipality with a population of more than 10,000 whose work relates directly to permits involving rainwater harvesting must receive appropriate training regarding rainwater harvesting standards and their relation to permitting at least once every five years. Members of the permitting staffs of counties and municipalities not located wholly or partly in an area designated by the Texas Commission on Environmental Quality as a priority groundwater management area under Section 35.008, Water Code, whose work relates directly to permits involving rainwater harvesting and members of the permitting staffs of counties and municipalities with a population of 10,000 or less whose work relates directly to permits involving rainwater harvesting are encouraged to receive the training. The Texas Water Development Board may provide appropriate training by seminars or by videotape or functionally similar and widely available media without cost.

(c) A municipality or county may not deny a building permit solely because the facility will implement rainwater harvesting. However, a municipality or county may require that a rainwater harvesting system comply with the minimum state standards established for such a system.

(d) Each school district is encouraged to implement rainwater harvesting at facilities of the district.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1311 (H.B. 3391), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2011.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 695 (H.B. 2781), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2013.